fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-astotin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - astotin :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      astotin+N+I+Sg: astotin
      astotin+N+I+Pl: astotina
      astotin+N+I+Loc: [astotinihk, astotinih]


      # Poss
      astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nitastotin
      astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: otastotin
      

      # Nonposs
      astotin+N+I+Sg: astotin
      astotin+N+I+Pl: astotina
      astotin+N+I+Loc: [astotinihk, astotinih]
      

      # Der/Dim
      astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [ascocinis, ascocinîs]
      

      # Poss # Sg
      astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nitastotin
      astotin+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kitastotin
      astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: otastotin
      astotin+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nitastotininân
      astotin+N+I+Px12Pl+Sg: kitastotininaw
      astotin+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kitastotiniwâw
      astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: otastotiniwâw
      astotin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: otastotinithiw

      
      
      

      # Poss # Pl
      astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nitastotina
      astotin+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kitastotina
      astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: otastotina
      astotin+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nitastotininâna
      astotin+N+I+Px12Pl+Pl: kitastotininawa
      astotin+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kitastotiniwâwa
      astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: otastotiniwâwa
      astotin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: otastotinithiwa
      

      # Poss # Loc
      astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: [nitastotinihk, nitastotinih]
      astotin+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: [kitastotinihk, kitastotinih]
      astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: [otastotinihk, otastotinih]
      astotin+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: [nitastotininâhk, nitastotininâh]
      astotin+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc: [kitastotininâhk, kitastotininâh]
      astotin+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: [kitastotiniwâhk, kitastotiniwâh]
      astotin+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: [otastotiniwâhk, otastotiniwâh]
      astotin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: [otastotinithihk, otastotinithih]
      
